Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-105, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 292, O.S.L. 2022 (26 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 14-105), is amended to read as follows:
Section 14-105. A. Any registered voter may apply for an
absentee ballot in person at the county election board, by United
States mail, by facsimile device as defined in Section 1862 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes or by a means of electronic
communication designated by the Secretary of the State Election
Board. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall prescribe a

Req. No. 10988 Page 1

form to be used for the application, although any application
setting forth substantially the same facts shall be valid.
B. 1. A registered voter applying for an absentee ballot by
means of electronic communication shall provide his or her name,
birth date, an identification number, and other information as may
be prescribed by the Secretary of the State Election Board. The
name, birth date, and identification number provided on the
application must match the name, birth date, and identification
number in the voter registration record in order to apply for an
absentee ballot pursuant to this subsection.
2. If the voter does not recall which identification number he
or she included in the voter registration record, the voter may
provide multiple identification numbers, at least one of which must
match the identification number in the voter registration record if
such record included an identification number. If the name, birth
date, or any identification number provided does not match the voter
registration record, the voter shall be informed of the failure to
match the voter registration record and shall be provided
information and instruction to contact the county election board.
3. If the voter registration record on file with the county
election board does not contain a birth date or identification
number, the voter shall not be eligible to apply for an absentee
ballot by means of electronic communication but may apply for an
absentee ballot pursuant to subsection C of this section.
Req. No. 10988 Page 2

4. Identifying information such as birth date and
identification number shall not be modified online in an existing
voter registration except as provided in Section 4-109.4 of this
title.
5. No later than January 1, 2023, a registered voter applying
for an absentee ballot pursuant to this subsection who meets the
criteria provided in Section 7-115.1 of this title shall be required
to confirm his or her address prior to submitting an application for
absentee ballot by means of electronic communication.
6. Registered voters applying for an absentee ballot by any
means must also provide a statement declaring why they are unable to
vote either early in-person absentee or on election day due to work,
school, or travel. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall
prescribe a form to be used for the statement required by this
paragraph. Failure to submit this statement will result in the
denial of the application.
C. 1. A registered voter applying for an absentee ballot in
person, by United States mail, or by facsimile device shall provide
his or her name, birth date, an identification number, and other
information as may be prescribed by the Secretary of the State
Election Board. The name, birth date, and identification number
provided on the application must match the name, birth date, and
identification number in the voter registration record.

Req. No. 10988 Page 3

2. If the voter does not recall which identification number he
or she included in the voter registration record, the voter may
provide multiple identification numbers, at least one of which must
match the identification number in the voter registration record if
such record included an identification number. If the voter
registration record does not contain a birth date or an
identification number, the absentee ballot application shall be
accepted without a match of a birth date or an identification
number.
D. For purposes of this section, "identification number" means
a number submitted on the registration application pursuant to
paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 4-112 of this title.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 14-103.1 of Title 26, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A registered voter who requests an absentee ballot pursuant to
the provisions of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes, unless
otherwise permitted by federal or state law, shall indicate on the
application the election date for which the absentee ballots are
requested. The application shall only be valid for the elections
held on that election date in which the voter is eligible to vote.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10988 MJ 01/14/25
Req. No. 10988 Page 4